Missouri, session 2026, HB2825.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 578.012, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 578.012, to read as follows:
578.012. 1. A person commits the offense of animal abuse if he or she:
(1) Intentionally or purposely kills an animal in any manner not allowed by or
expressly exempted from the provisions of sections 578.005 to 578.023 and 273.030;
(2) Purposely or intentionally causes injury or suffering to an animal; or
(3) Having ownership or custody of an animal knowingly fails to provide adequate
care which results in substantial harm to the animal.
2. Animal abuse is a class [A misdemeanor] E felony, unless the defendant has
previously been found guilty of animal abuse or the suffering involved in subdivision (2) of
subsection 1 of this section is the result of torture or mutilation consciously inflicted while the
animal was alive, in which case it is a class [E] D felony.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.